zh-TW: 雪茄打孔器類型: 子彈形; 鑽孔式; 折疊式; 鑰匙圈型; 槓桿式; 多尺寸扭曲; 可伸縮; 單尺寸扭曲; 彈簧式; 其他
nl: Type sigarenpons: Bullet; Boorstijl; Uitklapbaar; Sleutelhanger; Hefboom; Meerdere maten draai; Intrekbaar; Enkele maat draai; Veerbelast; Overig
nb: Sigarsaks-ype: Kule; Borestil; Brett ut; Nøkkelring; Spakefunksjon; Multi-størrelse vri; Uttrekkbar; Enkel størrelse vri; Fjærbelastet; Annet
ro-RO: Tip perforator de trabucuri: De tip glonț; Stil burghiu; Pliabil; Breloc; Acțiune de pârghie; Răsucire multidimensională; Retractabil; Răsucire unidimensională; Cu arc; Altele
tr: Puro delici tipi: Mermi uçlu; Matkap tipi; Katlanır; Anahtarlık; Kollu mekanizma; Çoklu çaplı döner tip; İçeri çekilebilir; Tek çaplı döner tip; Yay mekanizmalı; Diğer
sv: Typ av cigarrstans: Kula; Borrstil; Utfällbar; Nyckelring; Spakmekanism; Multi size twist; Hopfällbart; Single size twist; Fjäderladdad; Övrigt
lt-LT: Cigaro skylamušio tipas: Kulka; Gręžimo stilius; Išskleidžiamas; Raktų pakabukas; Svirtinis veiksmas; Daugiafunkcis sukimasis; Ištraukiamas; Vieno dydžio sukimasis; Spyruoklinis; Kita
ru: Тип пробойника для сигар: «Пуля»; В стиле дрели; Развернуть; Брелок; Рычажное действие; Многоразмерная скрутка; Выдвижной; Одноразмерная скрутка; Пружинный; Другой
es: Tipo de punzón para cigarro: Viñeta; Estilo de taladro; Desplegar; Llavero; Acción de palanca; Giros de varios tamaños; Retráctil; Giros de tamaño único; Con resorte; Otros
sk-SK: Typ dierovača na cigary: Guľka; Vŕtací; Vysúvací; Kľúčenka; Pákový; Viacnásobné otočenie; Sklopný; Jedno otočenie; Odpružený; Iné
ko: 시가 펀치 유형: 불릿; 드릴 스타일; 접이식; 열쇠고리; 레버 작동 방식; 멀티 사이즈 트위스트; 개폐식; 싱글 사이즈 트위스트; 스프링 탑재; 기타
da: Cigarstansetype: Bullet; Borestil; Udfoldelig; Nøglering; Håndtagsfunktion; Twist til flere størrelser; Udtrækkelig; Twist til enkel størrelse; Fjeder; Andet
zh-CN: 雪茄打孔器类型: 子弹型; 钻孔式; 折叠式; 钥匙链型; 杠杆式; 多尺寸旋转式; 可伸缩型; 单尺寸旋转式; 弹簧式; 其他
el: Τύπος διατρητήρα πούρων: Bullet; Στυλ τρυπανιού; Αναδιπλούμενος; Μπρελόκ; Με μηχανισμό μοχλού; Περιστροφικός πολλαπλών διαμέτρων; Αναδιπλούμενο; Περιστροφικός μίας διαμέτρου; Με ελατήριο; Άλλο
pt-BR: Tipo de furador de charuto: Furador; Cortador tipo furador; Desdobrável; Chaveiro; Ação de alavanca; Torção múltipla; Retrátil; Torção de tamanho único; Com mola; Outro
bg-BG: Тип перфоратор за пури: Тип „патрон“; С продупчване; Разгъваема; С ключодържател; С лост; Със завъртане - множество размери; Прибиращо се; Със завъртане – единичен размер; Пружинно; Друго
pt-PT: Tipo de furador de charuto: Achatado; Estilo broca; Desdobrável; Redondo; Ação de alavanca; Torção múltipla; Retrátil; Torção de tamanho único; Com mola; Outro
th: ประเภทของที่เจาะซิการ์: กระสุน; แบบสว่านเจาะ; แบบพับและกางออก; พวงกุญแจ; แบบกลไกคันโยก; แบบบิดหลายขนาด; แบบพับเก็บได้; แบบบิดขนาดเดียว; มีสปริง; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Vrsta luknjača za cigare: Bullet; Slog vrtanja; Razgrnite; Obesek za ključe; Vzvodno delovanje; Več velikosti zasuka; Izvlečno; Zasuk ene velikosti; Vzmetna; Druga
en: Cigar punch type: Bullet; Drill style; Fold out; Keychain; Lever action; Multi size twist; Retractable; Single size twist; Spring loaded; Other
hu: Szivarlyukasztó típus: Golyó; Fúró stílus; Kihajtható; Kulcstartó; Karos működésű; Különböző méretű, csavart; Visszahúzható; Azonos méretű, csavart; Rugós; Egyéb
fr: Type de coupe-cigare: Balle; Style perceuse; Dépliable; Porte-clés; Action par levier; Rotation multi-tailles; Rétractable; Rotation taille unique; À ressort; Autre
vi: Loại đục xì gà: Bullet; Kiểu khoan; Kiểu gấp mở; Móc chìa khóa; Kiểu cần gạt; Kiểu xoay đa kích thước; Có thể cuộn gọn; Kiểu xoay đơn kích thước; Chịu tải bằng lò xo; Khác
ja: シガーパンチの種類: バッレット; ドリルスタイル; 折り畳み式; キーチェーン; レバーアクション; マルチサイズツイスト; 格納式; シングルサイズツイスト; スプリング式; その他
fi: Sikarirei'ittimen tyyppi: Luodinmallinen; Poramalli; Taitto; Avaimenperä; Viputoiminen; Monikokoinen kierre; Sisäänvedettävä; Yksi koko -kierre; Jousikuormitteinen; Muu
hr-HR: Vrsta bušača cigara: U obliku metka; Stil bušilice; Preklopni; Privjesak; Polužni mehanizam; Više promjera; Na uvlačenje; Jedan promjer; S oprugom; Ostalo
pl: Typ obcinacza do cygar: Typ bullet; Typ "wiertło"; Składany; Brelok; Mechanizm dźwigniowy; Obrotowy – wiele rozmiarów; Wysuwany; Obrotowy – jeden rozmiar; Sprężynowy; Pozostałe
de: Zigarrenlochertyp: Kugel; Bohrer; Ausklappbar; Keychain; Hebelwirkung; Bohrer mit mehreren Größen; Einziehbar; Bohrer mit einer Größe; Federbelastet; Sonstiges
cs: Typ doutníkového vyštípávače: Bullet; Vrtákový; Výklopný; Klíčenka; Pákový; Otočný s několika velikostmi; Zasouvací; Otočný s jednou velikostí; Pružinové; Jiné
it: Tipo di punzone per sigari: Proiettile; Stile trapano; Pieghevole; Keychain; Azione a leva; A torsione multitaglia; Retrattile; A torsione singola taglia; Caricato a molla; Altro